Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-904
Conformity with ordinance; dedication of avenues, streets, and alleys.

The city council, described in section 16-902, shall have power to compel the owner of any real property in such area in subdividing, platting, or laying out the same to conform to the requirements of the ordinance and to lay out and dedicate the avenues, streets, and alleys in accordance therewith.

Laws 1957, c. 28, § 2(3), p. 184.

Act, of which this section was a part, sustained as constitutional. Schlientz v. City of North Platte, 172 Neb. 477, 110 N.W.2d 58 (1961).